zh-TW: 頭枕支架連接方式: 可調式綁帶 (環繞頭枕); 附螺栓支架; 雙柱夾鉗; 快拆夾鉗; 單柱夾鉗; 套入式頭枕套/護套; 其他
ko: 헤드레스트 마운트 부착 방법: 조절형 스트랩(헤드레스트 주변); 볼트 체결 브래킷; 듀얼 포스트 클램프; 퀵 릴리스 클램프; 싱글 포스트 클램프; 슬립온 헤드레스트 커버/슬리브; 기타
th: วิธีการยึดล็อกกับขาหมอนรองคอ: สายรัดปรับได้ (รอบพนักพิงศีรษะ); ขายึดพร้อมสลักเกลียว; แคลมป์ยึดเสาคู่; แคลมป์แบบปลดเร็ว; แคลมป์ยึดเสาเดี่ยว; ปลอกสวม/ที่หุ้มพนักพิงศีรษะ; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 头枕安装方式: 可调节束带（绕头枕）; 带螺栓的支架; 双柱夹; 快拆夹; 单柱夹; 滑入式头枕套/保护套; 其他
pt-BR: Método de fixação do suporte ao encosto de cabeça: Alça ajustável (ao redor do encosto de cabeça); Suporte com parafusos; Braçadeira de dois pinos; Braçadeira de liberação rápida; Braçadeira de pino único; Capa de encosto de cabeça tipo slip-on; Outro
it: metodo di fissaggio del supporto poggiatesta: Cinghia regolabile (intorno al poggiatesta); Staffa con bulloni; Morsetto a doppio perno; Morsetto a sgancio rapido; Morsetto a perno singolo; Fodera per poggiatesta da infilare; Altro
vi: Phương pháp gắn giá đỡ tựa đầu: Dây đeo có thể điều chỉnh (quanh tựa đầu); Giá đỡ có bu-lông; Kẹp hai thanh; Kẹp nhả nhanh; Kẹp một thanh; Vỏ bọc/ống luồn tựa đầu tròng qua; Khác
ja: ヘッドレストマウントの取り付け方法: 調節可能ストラップ (ヘッドレスト周囲); ボルト付きブラケット; デュアルポストクランプ; クイックリリースクランプ; シングルポストクランプ; スリップオンヘッドレストカバー/スリーブ; その他
el: Μέθοδος στερέωσης βάσης προσκέφαλου: Ρυθμιζόμενος ιμάντας (γύρω από το προσκέφαλο); Στήριγμα με βίδες; Σφιγκτήρας διπλού άξονα; Σφιγκτήρας ταχείας απασφάλισης; Σφιγκτήρας μονού άξονα; Εφαρμοστό κάλυμμα/περίβλημα προσκέφαλου; Άλλο
tr: Başlık montaj bağlantı yöntemi: Ayarlanabilir kayış (koltuk başlığı etrafında); Cıvatalı braket; Çift direkli kelepçe; Çabuk açılan kelepçe; Tek direkli kelepçe; Geçmeli koltuk başlığı kılıfı; Diğer
bg-BG: Метод за закрепване на облегалката за глава: Регулируема каишка (около облегалката за глава); Планка с болтове; Скоба с два щифта; Скоба за бързо освобождаване; Скоба с един щифт; Нахлузващ се калъф/ръкав за облегалка за глава; Други
da: Monteringsmetode for nakkestøttebeslag: Justerbar strop (omkring nakkestøtte); Beslag med bolte; Klemme til dobbeltstang; Quick release-klemme; Klemme til enkeltstang; Slip-on-cover/hylster til nakkestøtte; Andet
en: Headrest mount attachment method: Adjustable strap (around headrest); Bracket with bolts; Dual-post clamp; Quick-release clamp; Single-post clamp; Slip-on headrest cover/sleeve; Other
nl: Hoofdsteun bevestiging bevestigingsmethode: Verstelbare band (rond hoofdsteun); Beugel met bouten; Klem voor dubbele stang; Snelspanklem; Klem voor enkele stang; Opschuifbare hoofdsteunhoes; Overig
pt-PT: Método de fixação do suporte ao encosto de cabeça: Alça ajustável (em redor do encosto de cabeça); Suporte com parafusos; Abraçadeira de espigão duplo; Abraçadeira de aperto rápido; Abraçadeira de espigão simples; Capa/manga de encosto de cabeça de colocar; Outro
fi: Niskatuen kiinnitystapa: Säädettävä hihna (niskatuen ympäri); Kiinnike pultteineen; Kaksoistappikiinnike; Pikakiinnike; Yksitappikiinnike; Pujotettava niskatuen suoja/hiha; Muu
sv: Fästmetod för nackstödsmontering: Justerbar rem (runt nackstödet); Fäste med bultar; Klämma för dubbla stolpar; Snabbklämma; Klämma för enkel stolpe; Överdrag för nackstöd; Övrigt
fr: Méthode de fixation du support d’appuie-tête: Sangle réglable (autour de l’appui-tête); Support avec boulons; Pince à deux montants; Pince à dégagement rapide; Pince à montant unique; Housse/manchon d’appui-tête à enfiler; Autre
de: Befestigungsmethode der Kopfstützenhalterung: Verstellbarer Gurt (um die Kopfstütze); Halterung mit Schrauben; Doppelstreben-Klemme; Schnellspannerklemme; Einzelstreben-Klemme; Aufschiebbarer Kopfstützenbezug/-überzug; Sonstige
ro-RO: Metoda de fixare a suportului pentru tetieră: Curea ajustabilă (în jurul tetierei); Suport cu șuruburi; Clemă cu fixare pe două tije; Clemă cu eliberare rapidă; Clemă cu fixare pe o tijă; Husă/manșon glisant pentru tetieră; Altele
hr-HR: Način pričvršćivanja nosača za naslon za glavu: Prilagodljivi remen (oko naslona za glavu); Nosač s vijcima; Stezaljka s dvije šipke; Stezaljka za brzo otpuštanje; Stezaljka s jednom šipkom; Navlaka za naslon za glavu; Ostalo
nb: Festemetode for nakkestøtte: Justerbar stropp (rundt nakkestøtten); Brakett med bolter; Klemme med to stolper; Hurtigutløsende klemme; Klemme med én stolpe; Trekk / hylse til nakkestøtte; Annet
pl: Metoda mocowania uchwytu do zagłówka: Regulowany pasek (wokół zagłówka); Wspornik ze śrubami; Zacisk na dwóch wspornikach; Zacisk szybkozamykający; Zacisk na jednym wsporniku; Wsuwany pokrowiec/rękaw na zagłówek; Inna
sl-SI: Način pritrditve nosilca naslona za glavo: Prilagodljiv trak (okoli vzglavnika); Nosilec z vijaki; Dvojna objemka; Hitrovpenjalna objemka; Enojna objemka; Natakljiva prevleka/rokav za vzglavnik; Drugo
hu: Fejtámla rögzítési módja: Állítható pánt (fejtámla körül); Csavaros konzol; Kétoszlopos bilincs; Gyorskioldós bilincs; Egyoszlopos bilincs; Ráhúzható fejtámlahuzat; Egyéb
cs: Způsob upevnění opěrky hlavy: Nastavitelný popruh (kolem opěrky hlavy); Držák se šrouby; Svorka na dva sloupky; Rychloupínací svorka; Svorka na jeden sloupek; Natahovací potah/návlek na opěrku hlavy; Jiné
es: Método de fijación del soporte del reposacabezas: Correa ajustable (alrededor del reposacabezas); Soporte con pernos; Abrazadera de doble poste; Abrazadera de liberación rápida; Abrazadera de un solo poste; Funda deslizable para reposacabezas; Otro
sk-SK: Spôsob upevnenia držiaka opierky hlavy: Nastaviteľný popruh (okolo opierky hlavy); Konzola so skrutkami; Dvojstĺpiková svorka; Rýchloupínacia svorka; Jednostĺpiková svorka; Násuvný poťah/návlek na opierku hlavy; Iné
ru: Способ крепления держателя подголовника: Регулируемый ремень (вокруг подголовника); Кронштейн с болтами; Двухштыревой зажим; Быстросъемный зажим; Одноштыревой зажим; Чехол/рукав на подголовник; Другое
lt-LT: Galvos atramos laikiklio tvirtinimo metodas: Reguliuojamas dirželis (aplink galvos atlošą); Laikiklis su varžtais; Dviejų strypų spaustukas; Greitojo atleidimo spaustukas; Vieno strypo spaustukas; Užmaunamas galvos atlošo užvalkalas / mova; Kita